Louisiana, session 2026, HB686.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:73.15 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§73.15. Unlawful use of artificial intelligence in telephone calls
A. It shall be unlawful for any person to make any telephone call or
automated call which is created using artificial intelligence without providing a clear
and understandable disclosure at the beginning of the call that it was created using
artificial intelligence.
B. For purposes of this Section, "artificial intelligence" has the same
meaning as provided in R.S. 14:73.14.
C. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be fined not more
than seven hundred fifty dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1083 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 686